Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 3. Assessments Generally

§ 41-9-240.
Payment generally; unpaid assessments as liens; duty of clerk of court; state lands.

Unless otherwise provided by said order, such assessment shall be payable at once; and from the time of the entry of said order, assessments for construction of new work and additional assessments and interest thereon, shall be a lien upon the lands assessed, until paid. Any owner of land, or any corporation assessed for construction, may at any time within thirty (30) days after the confirmation of said report, pay into court, the amount of the assessment against his land or any tract thereof, or against any such corporation. Said payment shall relieve said lands from the lien of said assessment, and said corporation from all liability on said assessment. The clerk of said court shall collect no fees or commissions for collecting or disbursing such payments, and shall on demand of the commissioners of the district pay over to them all sums thus coming into his hands. Upon presentation to the state auditor of an order of the district court having jurisdiction of such drainage district, properly certified, the auditor shall draw his warrant on the treasurer on the common school account within the permanent land income fund in favor of the commissioners of such drainage district for the total amount that may be assessed against any lands included in such district, the title to which is in the state of Wyoming, and upon the payment of such warrants such lands shall thereby be relieved from the lien theretofore created for such costs of construction.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 64; 1915, ch. 155, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 1059; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-863; C.S. 1945, § 71-1526; W.S. 1957, § 41-422; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to costs of construction, see §

41-9-215

.

As to assessments upon particular tracts, etc., see §

41-9-216

.

As to assessments for construction generally, see §

41-9-217

.

As to costs of repairs, see §

41-9-219

.

As to assessments of drained lands outside of drainage districts, see §

41-9-264

.

As to levy of assessments on drained lands outside of drainage districts, see §

41-9-269

.

As to assessments for reconstruction, enlargement, etc., see §

41-9-278

.

As to municipal assessments generally in connection with joint operation of drainage district with municipalities, see §

41-9-401

et seq.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits, approved by court, without notice, for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tax sale as freeing property from possibility of further assessments for benefits to land, 11 ALR2d 1133.

§ 41-9-241.
Payment in installments.

At the time of confirmation of any assessment provided for by chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes 1920, or acts amendatory thereof or supplemental thereto, it shall be competent for the court to order the same to be paid in installments of such amount and at such time as will be convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes for which such assessment was made, and the payment of the principal and interest of such notes or bonds of said district as the court shall grant authority to issue, such installments to become delinquent on the same date or dates as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become delinquent, and such installments shall draw interest from the date of any notes or bonds issued by the district and for the payment of which said assessments are pledged, at such rate, not to exceed seven percent (7%) per annum, as may be fixed by the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 63; C.S. 1920, § 1058; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 1; 1923, ch. 10, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-862; C.S. 1945, § 71-1525; W.S. 1957, § 41-423.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

Chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, appears herein as §§

41-9-101

through

41-9-201

,

41-9-203

through

41-9-245

,

41-9-247

through

41-9-252

,

41-9-254

through

41-9-258

, and

41-9-260

through

41-9-273

.

§ 41-9-242.
Current expenses; annual budget generally.

Assessments to meet expenses of any current year of any district shall become due, payable and delinquent at such time or times each year as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become due, payable and delinquent. Commissioners having charge of any drain shall on or before the first Tuesday of June of each year file with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of such district, a report showing an itemized estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance and to meet the yearly current expenses of the district. In addition to the amount above provided, the commissioners may add a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. Within thirty (30) days after filing such annual report, at a time and place to be fixed by the court or a judge thereof, the judge shall examine such report, hear all objections thereto, fix and determine the amount to be raised by assessments for the current year and cause such adjudication to be entered of record in said court and a certified copy thereof to be delivered to the commissioners of such district. The commissioners shall add thereto such amount as may be necessary to meet the principal and interest on lawful indebtedness of the district maturing during the current year, together with a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. When thus completed it shall be known as “The budget of
. . . . .
Drainage District for the year (year)” and also be verified under oath by any one (1) of the commissioners.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 65; C.S. 1920, § 1060; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 3; 1923, ch. 10, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-864; C.S. 1945, § 71-1527; W.S. 1957, § 41-424; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to delinquent taxes generally, see §

39-13-108

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 66, (C.S. 1920, § 1061) was repealed by Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 11.

§ 41-9-243.
Assessment roll generally.

It shall be the duty of the commissioners of each drainage district, on or before the first Monday of August of each year to prepare an assessment roll of said district, which shall contain the name of the owner, if known, together with a description of each lot, tract and easement of land within said district, and the aggregate assessments of benefits confirmed by the court against the same; and the name of all corporations assessed, together with the aggregate assessment levied against such corporations respectively. The assessment roll shall also show the amount assessed against each lot, tract and easement of land, and against each corporation in the district, for current expense and to meet the principal and interest on the indebtedness of the district for the current year. All such assessments shall be apportioned on the aggregate assessment of benefits last confirmed by the court. When such assessment roll is completed it shall be signed by the commissioners of said district and verified by any one of them. On or before the first Monday in August, of each year the commissioners of the drainage district shall deliver to the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such drainage district the assessment roll of such district. The county commissioners of said county immediately upon the receipt of the assessment roll of such district and at the time of making the requisite tax levy for county purposes, shall levy and assess against each lot, tract and easement of land and against each corporation, the respective amounts levied and assessed against the same on said assessment roll. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of such county, and in case the territory embraced in such district is located in two (2) or more counties a copy of the assessment roll as certified to by the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such district shall be delivered to the assessor of each county in which any of the land of the district is located. Upon receipt of such assessment roll the assessors of the counties embracing any of the lands of such district shall extend upon the tax roll of such county the respective amounts levied and assessed against each lot, tract and easement of land, and against each corporation as shown by said assessment roll of said district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 67; C.S. 1920, § 1062; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 4; 1923, ch. 10, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-865; C.S. 1945, § 71-1528; W.S. 1957, § 41-425.

Cross references. —

As to assessment rolls and tax list generally, see §

39-11-101

et seq.

Applicability of revenue laws. —

State revenue laws for collection of taxes on real property for county purposes, except as modified by provisions of the drainage district legislation, are made applicable for the purpose of the drainage district act. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

State and county taxes. —

County treasurer has authority to receive payment of state and county taxes without the payment of drainage district assessments on the same land. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

§ 41-9-244.
Certification procedure.

When the commissioners shall fail to certify to the county commissioners of the proper county, any one (1) or more drainage assessments for construction, reconstruction, enlargement, extension, improvement, or repair, against any lands in said district, at the proper time, they may certify the same to the county commissioners of the proper county at any time thereafter, whether in the same or any subsequent year, as an additional assessment roll of said district for the then current year, and upon receipt of such additional assessment roll by such county commissioners it shall be the duty of such commissioners to make a levy therefor and to certify the same to the county assessor in the manner hereinbefore provided, and it shall then be the duty of the county assessor to add the said levy to the tax roll for the then current calendar year.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 69; C.S. 1920, § 1064; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-867; C.S. 1945, § 71-1530; W.S. 1957, § 41-426.

§ 41-9-245.
Additional assessments; generally.

If in the first assessment for construction the commissioners shall have reported to the court a smaller sum than is needed to complete the work of construction, or if in any year an additional sum is necessary to pay the principal of or interest on lawful indebtedness of said drainage district, further or additional assessments on the lands and corporations benefited, proportioned on the last assessment of benefits which has been approved by the court, shall be made by the commissioners of said drainage district under the order of the court or presiding judge thereof. Notice of hearing of the application for such additional assessment shall be published at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in one (1) newspaper published in each county in which said lands, or any part thereof, within said district are situated which further or additional assessments may be made payable in installments, as specified in W.S.

41-9-241

, and shall be treated and collected in the same manner as the original assessments for construction confirmed by the court, in said drainage district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 74; 1915, ch. 155, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 1069; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-872; C.S. 1945, § 71-1535; W.S. 1957, § 41-427.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits, approved by court, without notice, for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detailed plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 41-9-246.
Additional assessments; commissioner's petition; hearings; modification of budget.

The commissioners of any drainage district within the state of Wyoming shall not incur any indebtedness for current expenses of the district in excess of the amount provided in the budget: provided, however, in case a greater sum than that provided in the budget is required the commissioners may file a petition setting forth the causes therefor, with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of said district. Immediately upon the filing of said petition the court shall make an order fixing the time and place of hearing and directing the form and manner of notice thereof to be given if the court deem such hearing advisable. If the court shall authorize the expenditure of a greater sum of money the commissioners shall be authorized to incur indebtedness equal to the amount of the additional sum authorized by the court, and in case the expenditure occurs at a time when it is too late to place the amount upon the assessment roll for the current year, such amounts may be added to the budget of ensuing years. All debts contracted in contravention of this section shall be void.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 122-885; C.S. 1945, § 71-1548; W.S. 1957, § 41-428.

Cross references. —

See notes to §

41-9-257

.

§ 41-9-247.
Omissions; generally.

Omission to assess benefits, or to assess for construction, or to make additional assessment, or to make assessment for repairs, or to award damages to any one (1) or more tracts of land or easements in a drainage district, or to assess benefits, or to assess for construction, or to assess for repairs, or to make additional assessments against any corporation which should have been assessed, shall neither affect the jurisdiction of the court to confirm the report nor to render the benefits assessed, or the assessments for construction, or additional assessments, or assessments for repairs against other lands, or assessments against any corporation voidable, but the commissioners of said drainage district shall thereafter, as soon as they discover the omission, or as soon as notice thereof, either agree with the omitted parties upon the proper assessments and award the damages or assess such benefits, make such assessments for construction and make such additional assessments against the omitted lands and corporations, and award such damages as shall be just, and report the facts, together with such assessments and awards, to the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 75; C.S. 1920, § 1070; R.S. 1931, § 122-873; C.S. 1945, § 71-1536; W.S. 1957, § 41-429.

Cross references. —

As to omission with reference to assessments in connection with irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-406

,

41-7-407

.

§ 41-9-248.
Omissions; agreement between landowner and commissioners.

In case of omission to assess any corporation or land that should be assessed for benefits, or construction, or repair, or additional assessment, or to award damages, said omitted party and the owner of omitted land may in writing agree with the commissioners of said district what the assessment should be against said land, or against said corporation, or what said damages should be and such agreement shall be acknowledged and witnessed as provided above for waivers, and be filed in the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 97; C.S. 1920, § 1092; R.S. 1931, § 122-904; C.S. 1945, § 71-1567; W.S. 1957, § 41-430.

§ 41-9-249.
Application of state revenue laws; tax sale for delinquent assessments.

The revenue laws of this state for the collecting of taxes on real estate for county purposes, except as herein modified, shall be applicable for the purposes of this act, including the payment of interest and enforcement of penalties and forfeitures for delinquent taxes. All penalties and interest on assessments of a drainage district collected by the county treasurer shall be the property of such district, and all interest and penalties collected on assessments of such district levied for purposes other than bonded indebtedness shall be paid to the treasurer of the district levying such assessment; such payments to be made on or before the fifth day of the month following the date of such collection. In advertising property for sale for delinquent taxes the county treasurer shall show in a separate column in such advertisement the amount of unpaid drainage assessment levied against each lot, tract and easement of land in said district. The county treasurer of any county in which any portion of the land of any drainage district is located, and at the time of advertising real property for sale for state and county taxes shall include in such advertisement, the amount of delinquent drainage assessments against each lot, tract or easement of land. At the time and place of sale of real property for state and county taxes the county treasurer shall also separately sell the land for delinquent drainage district assessments and shall issue separate certificates of sale therefor. In offering such real estate for sale for drainage assessments the county treasurer shall offer the entire tract assessed and the first bid received in an amount sufficient to pay such assessment, together with interest, penalty and costs, shall be accepted and treasurer shall not attempt to secure a higher bid. In case no purchaser appears to purchase the land offered for sale for delinquent drainage assessments the treasurer shall make an entry on his delinquent tax roll “Sold to
. . . . .
Drainage District of
. . . . .
County, Wyoming” and shall issue a certificate of purchase to such district. The owner of any tract, lot or easement of land in a drainage district shall have the right to redeem the said land at any time within eighteen (18) months from the date of sale thereof by the county treasurer as shown on said certificate by paying therefor the amount for which said land was sold by the county treasurer, together with such penalties and interest as may be provided by law relative to sales of land for delinquent state and county taxes, and in case the owner of any lot, tract or easement of land in any district shall fail to redeem said land from said sale for drainage assessment, the county treasurer shall issue a deed therefor to the purchaser at said sale, his heirs or assigns. The drainage district purchasing such land at said sale shall have all the right of natural persons in regard to owning, holding and selling such certificate and including the receipt of a deed, holding the title to real estate and selling and disposing of the same. The commissioners shall in no case sell said land or certificate of purchase for an amount less than the amount for which said land was sold to said district, including interest thereon, unless authorized so to do by the court. The procedure for the issuing of the deed, including the form of the deed, time of publication and service of notice of intention to apply for deed, shall be the same as is now or may hereafter be provided by law for the issuances of tax deeds by the county treasurer upon the sale of land for state and county taxes, except as herein modified.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 68; C.S. 1920, § 1063; Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-866; C.S. 1945, § 71-1529; W.S. 1957, § 41-431.

Cross references. —

As to taxation and revenue generally, see title 39.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see note to §

41-9-110

.

In general. —

The revenue laws of the state for the collection of taxes on real property for county purposes, except as modified by the provisions of the drainage district legislation, are made applicable for the purpose of the drainage district act. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Penalties and interest. —

Drainage district is entitled to penalties and interest collected on its drainage taxes by county treasurer, even though it does not need the money so collected. Riverton Valley Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 52 Wyo. 336, 74 P.2d 871,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1937).

Receipt of taxes. —

The county treasurer has authority to receive payment of state and county taxes without the payment of drainage district assessments on the same land. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Sale. —

Where state held bonds of a drainage district, which at sale for delinquent assessments, purchased a certain tract of land and held it until it received an offer to purchase it from the district for sum less than the amount of assessments and interest against it, district could sell at price offered without violating art. 3, § 40, Wyo. Const., as there would be no impairment nor reduction of obligations held by the state. Big Bend Drainage Dist. v. State, 50 Wyo. 242, 60 P.2d 815,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 41-9-250.
Objections; landowners to show cause; presumption of validity of assessments.

Any owner of land, or any interest in land, within a drainage district, who claims that his land in said district is exempt from liability for, or lien of any assessment for construction or repairs, or any additional assessment by said commissioners levied against the same whether said assessments be the first or any subsequent assessment or questions the legality of such assessment, may at any time, on ten (10) days notice, or order to show cause, be brought before the court having jurisdiction and required to show cause why said land should not be bound by all drainage district assessments in any report or reports of the commissioners of said district assessed against the same. The presumption shall be in favor of the regularity of such assessments, and they shall stand as valid assessments unless the owner of such land, or some interest therein shall show that said assessment is inequitable, or is void because the lands were not subject to assessment in the first instance.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 76; C.S. 1920, § 1071; R.S. 1931, § 122-874; C.S. 1945, § 71-1537; W.S. 1957, § 41-432.

§ 41-9-251.
Objections; statement of owner; default; decrees; appeal; adjournment of hearing; trial.

On the return day of said notice, or order to show cause, the said owner shall in writing, verified on oath, state the facts on which his claim is based. If he fails to appear and set forth such facts, upon the filing of the proof of service of such notice, or order to show cause upon him when notice is necessary, an order shall be made by the court confirming such assessment or assessments, which order shall be final and conclusive unless appealed from to the supreme court within thirty (30) days. The court may adjourn the hearing on said return day and thereafter, and if on the return day, or adjourned day, a trial is found necessary, the court shall fix the time and place of trial, and frame all necessary issues as provided in W.S.

41-9-104

.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 77; C.S. 1920; § 1072; R.S. 1931, § 122-875; C.S. 1945, § 71-1538; W.S. 1957, § 41-433.

§ 41-9-252.
Objections; procedure when assessments declared void.

In case the court decides that such lands could not, at the time said assessment or assessments were made, be assessed for drainage purposes, and that said assessment or assessments, are void, the commissioner shall levy an additional assessment on all of the assessable lands and corporations in said district based on the last assessment of benefits approved by the court, to pay the sum lost to the district by reason of the void assessment, or shall pay said sum out of the general funds of the district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 78; C.S. 1920, § 1073; R.S. 1931, § 122-876; C.S. 1945, § 71-1539; W.S. 1957, § 41-434.

§ 41-9-253.
Assessments as liens generally.

All assessment provided for in chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes 1920, and acts amendatory thereto and supplemental thereof, together with all interest thereon, and all penalties for default in the payment of same, and all costs of collecting the same shall, from the date of the order of court confirming such assessments until paid, constitute a perpetual lien in amount not in excess of the benefits severally assessed, upon all the land and other property against which such assessments shall be levied, as provided in this act, to which only the lien of the state for general state, county, city, town or school taxes, shall be paramount, and no sale of such property to enforce any general state, county, municipal, or school tax, or other lien shall extinguish the lien of such assessments.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 122-886; C.S. 1945, § 71-1549; W.S. 1957, § 41-435.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to Laws 1923, ch. 10, which appears herein as §§

41-9-116

,

41-9-215

,

41-9-241

through

41-9-243

,

41-9-246

,

41-9-249

,

41-9-253

,

41-9-257

and

41-9-259

.

In general. —

The revenue laws of the state for the collection of taxes on real property for county purposes, except as modified by the provisions of the drainage district legislation, are made applicable for the purpose of the drainage district act. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Receipt of taxes. —

The county treasurer has authority to receive payment of state and county taxes without the payment of drainage district assessments on the same land. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Priority of liens. —

Under this section, lien of drainage district assessment is inferior to lien of general taxes. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

As to controversies between private parties, special assessment liens in drainage district were not made of equal dignity with lien for general taxes by statute authorizing state to invest permanent school funds in drainage district bonds. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Lien of state under bonds issued by drainage district in which permanent school funds were invested is superior to lien of general taxes. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Sale. —

Term “sale” on its face is not so extensive as to forbid that tax deed should cut off lien of drainage assessment. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Tax deed, effect. —

Tax deed issued pursuant to lien for general taxes extinguishes in toto, both past and future assessments in drainage district. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Necessary parties. —

Bondholders need not be brought in as necessary parties to action where their interests do not conflict with those of drainage district and where they are virtually represented by the district, so long as the latter acts in good faith. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

Barlow v. Lonabaugh, 61 Wyo. 118, 156 P.2d 289,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1945).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Tax Lien Priority,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 255.

§ 41-9-254.
Assessment as court judgment.

Each and every sum assessed for construction, for additional assessment or for repairs against any land or against any corporation, as soon as such assessment is confirmed by the court, shall be and is declared to be a judgment of the district court in favor of said drainage district and against said land or corporation, and unless some other method of collection is herein provided, shall be collected in the same manner as any other money judgment is collected, provided that whenever said assessment is a lien upon land it shall only be collected out of said land on which it is a lien.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 93; C.S. 1920, § 1088; R.S. 1931, § 122-900; C.S. 1945, § 71-1563; W.S. 1957, § 41-436.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see chapter 17 of title 1.

As to sale of real estate for taxes, see §§

39-13-108

.

§ 41-9-255.
Conclusiveness of order; appeals generally.

The collection of any assessments made by the commissioners for construction and confirmed by the court, shall not be restrained or obstructed by reason of any omission, imperfection or defect in the organization of any district or in any proceedings occurring prior to the order confirming the assessments of benefits, but such order shall be conclusive as to the regularity of all proceedings relating to the assessments of the benefits unless appealed from within thirty (30) days after the entry of such order.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 99; C.S. 1920, § 1094; R.S. 1931, § 122-906; C.S. 1945, § 71-1569; W.S. 1957, § 41-437.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Tax Lien Priority,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 255 (1950).

§ 41-9-256.
Notes and bonds generally.

The commissioners may borrow money, not exceeding the amount of assessment for construction, additional assessments and assessments for repairs, reconstruction, enlargement, extension and improvement, unpaid at the time of borrowing for the construction, repair, reconstruction, enlargement, extension or improvement of a work which they shall be authorized to construct, repair, reconstruct, enlarge, extend or improve, or for the payment of indebtedness they may have lawfully incurred, and may secure the same by notes or bonds, bearing interest and not running beyond one (1) year after the last installment of the assessment, on the account of which the money is borrowed, shall fall due, which notes or bonds shall not be sold at less than ninety percent (90%) of their face value, which bonds are transferable by delivery to the same extent as negotiable paper of the highest character. The notes or bonds shall not be held to make the commissioners personally liable, but shall be held to be the lawful indebtedness of the district and constitute a lien upon the assessments for the repayment of the principal and interest of the notes or bonds.

In case any monies derived from bonds sold to pay for the original construction of said drainage system, or for the reconstruction, enlargement, extension or improvement thereof, now or hereafter, remains on hand after such work is completed and paid for, and not raised for damages unpaid for, such residue may be used in maintenance and repair work, as in this act provided before making assessments for such maintenance and repair.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 79; C.S. 1920, § 1074; Laws 1921, ch. 166, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 122-877; C.S. 1945, § 71-1540; W.S. 1957, § 41-438; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 38; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see note to §

41-9-110

.

Delinquent annual assessment sales. —

Constitutional provision against extinguishing obligations owned by state does not prevent sale of land purchased by drainage district for delinquent annual assessments for less than amount of accrued unpaid assessments, because bonds of district were owned by state, where sale price represented fair value of the land and was adequate to pay principal and interest due on bonded debt, but not accrued statutory interest thereon. Big Bend Drainage Dist. v. State, 50 Wyo. 242, 60 P.2d 815,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1936).

Sale. —

Where state held bonds of a drainage district, which at sale for delinquent assessments, purchased a certain tract of land and held it until it received an offer to purchase it from the district for a sum less than the amount of assessments and interest against it, district could sell at price offered without violating art. 3, § 40, Wyo. Const., as there would be no impairment nor reduction of obligations held by the state. Big Bend Drainage Dist. v. State, 50 Wyo. 242, 60 P.2d 815,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 41-9-257.
Refunding of indebtedness.

The court may, upon the petition of the commissioners, authorize them to refund any lawful indebtedness of the district now existing or which may hereafter be incurred by taking up and canceling all or a part of its outstanding notes and bonds, as fast as they become due or before, if the holders thereof will surrender the same, and issue in lieu thereof new notes or bonds of the district, payable in a time as the court deems proper, in an amount sufficient to retire all notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, together with an amount as the commissioners of the district deem necessary to provide for possible future defaults and delinquencies in the payment of assessments. For the purpose of providing funds to pay the refunding bonds with interest thereon, the commissioners may levy assessments against the land in the district, but not in excess of the benefits assessed. In the alternative the commissioners may, if they deem it advisable, issue refunding bonds in an amount sufficient only to retire all notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, and may, if they desire to provide a fund to provide for possible defaults and delinquencies in the payment of assessments, levy from year to year assessments against the land in the district for these purposes, but not in excess of the benefits assessed against the same.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 80; C.S. 1920, § 1075; Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 122-884; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 15, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1547; W.S. 1957, § 41-439; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 39; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Drainage district agent of bondholders. —

A drainage district is, in a sense, an agent of its bondholders in causing assessments to be made and in protecting their interest. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Necessary parties. —

Bondholders need not be brought in as necessary parties to action where their interests do not conflict with those of drainage district and where they are virtually represented by the district, so long as latter acts in good faith. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-9-258.
Effect of change in assessments upon existing bonds.

No bonds or other obligations issued by any drainage district shall be adversely affected by any subsequent change in assessments of benefits.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 94; C.S. 1920, § 1089; R.S. 1931, § 122-901; C.S. 1945, § 71-1564; W.S. 1957, § 41-440.

§ 41-9-259.
Collection generally.

All drainage assessments shall be collected by the same officer and in the same manner and at the same time as state and county taxes are collected and when collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, except such assessments, together with interest, penalty and costs thereon, as are collected upon assessments levied for the payment of principal and interest of bonded indebtedness of said district, which funds shall be retained by the county treasurer of the county in which such district is organized, and the principal and interest of all bonded indebtedness of such district shall be paid by such county treasurer from such fund, at the place of payment designated in said bonds and interest coupons; provided, that when all bonded indebtedness of any drainage district is fully paid and retired such funds remaining in the hands of the county treasurer shall be paid to the treasurer of such district, for the use of the district. The commissioners of any drainage district may elect the treasurer of the county having jurisdiction of such district treasurer of such district.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 122-887; C.S. 1945, § 71-1550; W.S. 1957, § 41-441.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 11, repealed C.S. 1920, ch. 76, § 1061, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Revenue laws applicable. —

The revenue laws of the state for the collection of taxes on real property for county purposes, except as modified by provisions of the drainage district legislation, are made applicable for the purpose of the drainage district act. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Penalties and interest. —

Drainage district is entitled to penalties and interest collected on its drainage taxes by county treasurer, even though it does not need the money so collected. Riverton Valley Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 52 Wyo. 336, 74 P.2d 871,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1937).

Receipt of taxes. —

The county treasurer has authority to receive payment of state and county taxes without the payment of drainage district assessments on the same land. State v. Cole, 43 Wyo. 209, 299 P. 1040,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1931).

Presumption. —

The court cannot presume that any bonds are outstanding but on the contrary must presume that county treasurer performed his duty, and did not put into the general fund of the county money which belongs to the bondholders. Board of Comm'rs v. Byron Drainage Dist., 52 Wyo. 417, 75 P.2d 759,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1938).

Treasurer's status. —

In collecting drainage district and similar taxes the county treasurer acts for the district and not as a county officer. Board of Comm'rs v. Byron Drainage Dist., 52 Wyo. 417, 75 P.2d 759,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1938).